Florida, session 2026, SB1092.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âSubsection (3) of section 461.007, Florida 29 Statutes, is amended to read: 30 461.007âRenewal of license.â 31 (3)âThe board may by rule prescribe continuing education, 32 not to exceed 40 hours biennially, as a condition for renewal of 33 a license, with a minimum of 2 hours of continuing education 34 related to the safe and effective prescribing of controlled 35 substances for licensees who are registered with the United 36 States Drug Enforcement Administration and authorized to 37 prescribe controlled substance pursuant to 21 U.S.C. s. 822. The 38 criteria for such programs or courses shall be approved by the 39 board. 40 Section 2.âSection 461.011, Florida Statutes, is created to 41 read: 42 461.011âCellular and tissue-based products.â 43 (1)âThe Legislature recognizes the significant potential of 44 cellular and tissue-based products in advancing medical 45 treatments and improving patient outcomes and further recognizes 46 the need to ensure that such treatments are provided using 47 cellular or tissue-based products obtained in an ethical manner 48 that does not involve cells derived from aborted fetuses. It is 49 the intent of the Legislature to foster medical innovation while 50 upholding ethical standards that respect the sanctity of life. 51 By encouraging the use of cellular or tissue-based products, the 52 state will advance regenerative medicine in a manner consistent 53 with the values of the state. 54 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 55 (a)ââCellular or tissue-based productsâ means products 56 containing or consisting of human cells or tissues which are 57 intended for implantation, transplantation, infusion, or 58 transfer into a human recipient. The term does not include: 59 1.âVascularized human organs for transplantation; 60 2.âWhole blood or blood components or blood derivative 61 products; 62 3.âSecreted or extracted human products, such as milk, 63 collagen, and cell factors, other than semen; 64 4.âMinimally manipulated bone marrow for homologous use and 65 not combined with another article other than water, 66 crystalloids, or a sterilizing, preserving, or storage agent, if 67 the addition of the agent does not raise new clinical safety 68 concerns with respect to the bone marrow; 69 5.âAncillary products used in the manufacture of human 70 cells, tissues, or cellular or tissue-based products; 71 6.âCells, tissues, and organs derived from animals; 72 7.âIn vitro diagnostic products; 73 8.âBlood vessels recovered with an organ which are intended 74 for use in organ transplantation and labeled âFor use in organ 75 transplantation onlyâ; or 76 9.âHarvesting and reimplantation of autologous tissue. 77 (b)ââMinimally manipulatedâ means: 78 1.âFor structural tissue, processing that does not alter 79 the original relevant characteristics of the tissue relating to 80 the tissueâs utility for reconstruction, repair, or replacement. 81 2.âFor cells or nonstructural tissues, processing that does 82 not alter the relevant biological characteristics of cells or 83 tissues. 84 (c)ââProcedure using cellular or tissue-based productsâ 85 means a treatment involving the use of human cells, tissues, or 86 cellular or tissue-based products which complies with the 87 regulatory requirements provided in this section. The term does 88 not include treatment or research using human cells or tissues 89 derived from a fetus or an embryo after an abortion. 90 (3)(a)âA podiatric physician may perform a procedure using 91 cellular or tissue-based products that are not approved by the 92 United States Food and Drug Administration if such products are 93 used for treatment or procedures within the scope of practice 94 for such podiatric physician and the treatment or procedures are 95 related to connective tissue, ligament, and tendon repair; wound 96 care; or pain management. 97 (b)âTo ensure that the retrieval, manufacture, storage, and 98 use of any cellular or tissue-based products pursuant to this 99 section meet the highest standards, any cellular or tissue-based 100 products used by a podiatric physician for a procedure provided 101 under this section must meet all of the following conditions: 102 1.âBe retrieved, manufactured, and stored in a facility 103 that is registered and regulated by the United States Food and 104 Drug Administration. 105 2.âBe retrieved, manufactured, and stored in a facility 106 that is certified or accredited by one of the following 107 entities: 108 a.âThe National Marrow Donor Program. 109 b.âThe World Marrow Donor Association. 110 c.âThe Association for the Advancement of Blood and 111 Biotherapies. 112 d.âThe American Association of Tissue Banks. 113 3.âContain viable or live cells upon post-thaw analysis and 114 be included in a post-thaw viability analysis report for the 115 product lot, which must be sent to the podiatric physician 116 before use with the podiatric physicianâs patient. 117 (4)(a)âA podiatric physician who performs a procedure using 118 cellular or tissue-based products pursuant to this section shall 119 include the following in any form of advertisement: 120 121 THIS NOTICE MUST BE PROVIDED TO YOU UNDER FLORIDA LAW. 122 This podiatric physician performs procedures using 123 cellular or tissue-based products that have not yet 124 been approved by the United States Food and Drug 125 Administration. You are encouraged to consult with 126 your primary care provider before undergoing any 127 procedure using these products. 128 129 (b)âThe notice required under paragraph (a) must be clearly 130 legible and in a type size no smaller than the largest type size 131 used in the advertisement. 132 (5)(a)âA podiatric physician who performs a procedure using 133 cellular or tissue-based products pursuant to this section shall 134 obtain a signed consent form from the patient before performing 135 the procedure. 136 (b)âThe consent form must be signed by the patient or, if 137 the patient is not legally competent, the patientâs 138 representative, and must state all of the following in language 139 the patient or his or her representative may reasonably be 140 expected to understand: 141 1.âThe nature and character of the proposed treatment. 142 2.âThat the proposed procedure uses cellular or tissue 143 based products that have not yet been approved by the United 144 States Food and Drug Administration. 145 3.âThe anticipated results of the proposed treatment. 146 4.âThe recognized serious possible risks, complications, 147 and anticipated benefits involved in the treatment and in the 148 recognized possible alternative forms of treatment, including 149 nontreatment. 150 5.âThat the patient is encouraged to consult with his or 151 her primary care provider before undergoing the procedure. 152 (6)âThis section does not apply to the following: 153 (a)âA podiatric physician who has obtained approval for an 154 investigational new drug or device from the United States Food 155 and Drug Administration for the use of human cells, tissues, or 156 cellular or tissue-based products; or 157 (b)âA podiatric physician who performs procedures using 158 cellular or tissue-based products under an employment or other 159 contract on behalf of an institution certified or accredited by 160 any of the following: 161 1.âThe Foundation for the Accreditation of Cellular 162 Therapy. 163 2.âThe Blood and Marrow Transplant Clinical Trials Network. 164 3.âThe Association for the Advancement of Blood and 165 Biotherapies. 166 (7)âA violation of this section may subject the podiatric 167 physician to disciplinary action by the board. 168 (8)âA podiatric physician who willfully performs, or 169 actively participates in, the following commits a felony of the 170 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 171 or s. 775.084, and is subject to disciplinary action under this 172 chapter and s. 456.072: 173 (a)âTreatment or research using human cells or tissues 174 derived from a fetus or an embryo after an abortion; or 175 (b)âThe sale, manufacture, or distribution of computer 176 products created using human cells, tissues, or cellular or 177 tissue-based products. 178 (9)âThe board may adopt rules necessary to implement this 179 section. 180 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.